Hawaii statutes.
[§90D-6]
Powers, duties, and functions.
The commission shall:

(1) Ensure that
its funding decisions meet all federal and state statutory requirements;

(2) Recommend
innovative, creative, statewide service programs to increase volunteer
participation in all age groups and community-based problem-solving among
diverse participants;

(3) Prepare a
national three-year service plan for the State, which follows state and federal
guidelines;

(4) Develop and
implement a centralized, organized system of obtaining information and
technical support concerning volunteerism and community service recruitment,
projects, training methods, materials, and activities throughout Hawaii and
share the information and support upon request;

(5) Promote
strong interagency collaboration as an avenue for maximizing resources and
provide that model on the state level;

(6) Provide
public recognition and support of individual volunteer efforts and successful
or promising private sector initiatives and public-private partnerships that
address community needs;

(7) Stimulate
increased community awareness of the impact of volunteer services in Hawaii;

(8) Use local,
state, and federal resources to reinforce, expand, and initiate quality service
programs;

(9) Serve as the
State’s liaison and voice to appropriate national and state organizations that
support its mission;

(10) Prepare the
State's applications under Title 42 United States Code sections 12543 and
12582, as amended;

(11) Assist in the
preparation of the department of education's application for assistance under
Title 42 United States Code section 12525;

(12) Prepare the
State’s application under Title 42 United States Code section 12582, as
amended, for approved national service positions;

(13) Make
technical assistance available to enable applicants for assistance under Title
42 United States Code section 12571, as amended, to plan and implement service
programs and to apply for assistance under the federal service laws such as the
federal National Services Trust Program;

(14) Assist in the
provision of health care and child care benefits under Title 42 United States
Code section 12594, as amended, to participants in national service programs
that receive assistance under Title 42 United States Code section 12571, as amended;

(15) Develop a
state system for the recruitment and placement of participants in programs that
receive assistance under the national service laws and disseminate information
concerning national service programs that receive the assistance of approved
national service positions;

(16) Administer
the State’s grant program in support of national service programs (using
assistance provided to the State under Title 42 United States Code section
12571, as amended) including selection, oversight, and evaluation of grant
recipients;

(17) Coordinate
its functions (including recruitment, public awareness, and training
activities) with any division of the federal ACTION program or the Corporation
for National and Community Services that carries out volunteer service programs
in the State; and

(18) Comply with
the requirements and duties of the commission as provided by Title 42 United
States Code section 12638, as amended. [L 2002, c 88, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next